Nevada, session 83, AB498-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 286 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 286.410 to 286.462, inclusive, and
sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 and 4 of this
act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Normal cost” means that portion of the present
value of projected benefits that is attributable to the current year
of service, as determined by an actuary of the System.
Sec. 4. “Participating state agency” means the following
public employers that participate in the System:
1. An agency, bureau, board, commission, department,
division, officer or other unit of the Executive Branch of the State
Government. The term includes the Nevada System of Higher
Education and the Public Employees’ Retirement System.
2. The Legislative Branch of the State Government.
3. The Judicial Branch of the State Government.
-
*AB498_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 5. NRS 286.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.410 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
3, the employee contribution rate must be:
(a) The matching contribution rate for employees and employers
that is actuarially determined for police officers and firefighters and
for regular members, depending upon the retirement fund in which
the member is participating.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, adjusted on
the first monthly retirement reporting period commencing on or
after July 1 of each odd-numbered year based on the actuarially
determined contribution rate indicated in the biennial actuarial
valuation and report of the immediately preceding year. The
adjusted rate must be rounded to the nearest one-quarter of 1
percent.
2. [The] Except as provided in subsection 4, the employee’s
portion of the matching contribution rate for employees and
employers must not be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if:
(a) The existing rate is lower than the actuarially determined rate
but within one-quarter of 1 percent of the actuarially determined
rate.
(b) The existing rate is higher than the actuarially determined
rate but is within 1 percent of the actuarially determined rate. If the
existing rate is more than 1 percent higher than the actuarially
determined rate, the existing rate must be reduced by the amount by
which it exceeds 1 percent above the actuarially determined rate.
3. The employee contribution rate for a member who is an
employee of a participating state agency must be:
(a) One-half of the normal cost that is actuarially determined
for police officers and firefighters and for regular members,
depending on the retirement fund in which the member is
participating.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, adjusted on
the first monthly retirement reporting period commencing on or
after July 1 of each odd-numbered year based on the actuarially
determined contribution rate of one-half the normal cost as
indicated in the biennial actuarial valuation and report of the
immediately preceding year. The adjusted rate must be rounded to
the nearest one-quarter of 1 percent.
4. The employee’s portion of the contribution rate for
employees of a participating state agency and employers must not
be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 if:
-
*AB498_R1*

– 4 –
(a) The existing rate is lower than the actuarially determined
rate but within one-quarter of 1 percent of the actuarially
determined rate.
(b) The existing rate is higher than the actuarially determined
rate but is within 1 percent of the actuarially determined rate. If
the existing rate is more than 1 percent higher than the actuarially
determined rate, the existing rate must be reduced by the amount
by which it exceeds 1 percent above the actuarially determined
rate.
5. From each payroll during the period of the employee’s
membership, the employer shall deduct the amount of the member’s
contributions and transmit the deduction to the Board at intervals
designated and upon forms prescribed by the Board. The
contributions must be paid on compensation earned by a member
from the member’s first day of service.
[4.] 6. Any employee whose position is determined after
July 1, 1971, to be eligible under the early retirement provisions for
police officers and firefighters shall contribute the additional
contributions required of police officers and firefighters from July 1,
1971, to the date of the employee’s enrollment under the Police and
Firefighters’ Retirement Fund, if employment in this position
occurred before July 1, 1971, or from date of employment in this
position to the date of the employee’s enrollment under the Police
and Firefighters’ Retirement Fund, if employment occurs later.
[5.] 7. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 286.430, the
System shall guarantee to each member the return of at least the
total employee contributions which the member has made and which
were credited to the member’s individual account. These
contributions may be returned to the member, the member’s estate
or beneficiary or a combination thereof in monthly benefits, a lump-
sum refund or both.
[6.] 8. Members with disabilities who are injured on the job
and receive industrial insurance benefits for temporary total
disability remain contributing members of the System for the
duration of the benefits if and while the public employer continues
to pay the difference between these benefits and the member’s
regular compensation. The public employer shall pay the employer
contributions on these benefits.
Sec. 6. NRS 286.421 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.421 1. A public employer that elected to pay on behalf of
its employees the contributions required by subsection 1 of NRS
286.410 before July 1, 1983, shall continue to do so, but a public
employer may not elect to pay those contributions on behalf of its
employees on or after July 1, 1983.
-
*AB498_R1*

– 5 –
2. An employee of a public employer that did not elect to pay
on behalf of its employees the contributions required by subsection
1 of NRS 286.410 before July 1, 1983, may elect to:
(a) Pay the contribution required by subsection 1 or 3 of NRS
286.410 , as applicable, on the employee’s own behalf; or
(b) Have the employee’s portion of the contribution paid by the
employee’s employer pursuant to the provisions of NRS 286.425.
3. Except for any person chosen by election or appointment to
serve in an elective office of a political subdivision or as a district
judge, a judge of the Court of Appeals or a justice of the Supreme
Court of this State:
(a) Payment of the employee’s portion of the contributions
pursuant to subsection 1 or paragraph (b) of subsection 2 must be:
(1) Made in lieu of equivalent basic salary increases or cost-
of-living increases, or both; or
(2) Counterbalanced by equivalent reductions in employees’
salaries.
(b) The average compensation from which the amount of
benefits payable pursuant to this chapter is determined must be
increased with respect to each month beginning after June 30, 1975,
by 50 percent of the contribution made by the public employer, and
must not be less than it would have been if contributions had been
made by the member and the public employer separately. In the case
of any officer or judge described in this subsection, any contribution
made by the public employer on the officer’s or judge’s behalf does
not affect the officer’s or judge’s compensation but is an added
special payment.
4. Employee contributions made by a public employer must be
deposited in either the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund or the
Police and Firefighters’ Retirement Fund as is appropriate. These
contributions must not be credited to the individual account of the
member and may not be withdrawn by the member upon the
member’s termination.
5. The membership of an employee who became a member on
or after July 1, 1975, and all contributions on whose behalf were
made by the member’s public employer must not be cancelled upon
the termination of the member’s service.
6. If an employer is paying the basic contribution on behalf of
an employee, the total contribution rate, in lieu of the amounts
required by subsection 1 or 3 of NRS 286.410 , as applicable, and
NRS 286.450, must be:
(a) The total contribution rate for employers that is actuarially
determined for police officers and firefighters and for regular
members, depending upon the retirement fund in which the member
is participating.
-
*AB498_R1*

– 6 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, adjusted on
the first monthly retirement reporting period commencing on or
after July 1 of each odd-numbered year based on the actuarially
determined contribution rate indicated in the biennial actuarial
valuation and report of the immediately preceding year. The
adjusted rate must be rounded to the nearest one-quarter of 1
percent.
7. The total contribution rate for employers must not be
adjusted in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of
subsection 6 if:
(a) The existing rate is lower than the actuarially determined rate
but is within one-half of 1 percent of the actuarially determined rate.
(b) The existing rate is higher than the actuarially determined
rate but is within 2 percent of the actuarially determined rate. If the
existing rate is more than 2 percent higher than the actuarially
determined rate, the existing rate must be reduced by the amount by
which it exceeds 2 percent above the actuarially determined rate.
8. For the purposes of adjusting salary increases and cost-of-
living increases or of salary reduction [,] :
(a) For a member who is employed by a public employer that is
not a participating state agency, the total contribution must be
equally divided between employer and employee.
(b) For a member who is employed by a public employer that is
a participating state agency, the total contribution must be divided
between the participating state agency and employee in the same
manner as the employee contribution rate is determined pursuant
to subsection 3 of NRS 286.410 and the employer contribution rate
is determined pursuant to section 2 of NRS 286.450.
9. Public employers other than the State of Nevada shall pay
the entire employee contribution for those employees who
contribute to the Police and Firefighters’ Retirement Fund on and
after July 1, 1981.
Sec. 7. NRS 286.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.450 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
3, the employer contribution rate must be:
(a) The matching contribution rate for employees and employers
that is actuarially determined for police officers and firefighters and
for regular members, depending upon the retirement fund in which
the member is participating.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, adjusted on
the first monthly retirement reporting period commencing on or
after July 1 of each odd-numbered year based on the actuarially
determined contribution rate indicated in the biennial actuarial
valuation and report of the immediately preceding year. The
-
*AB498_R1*

– 7 –
adjusted rate must be rounded to the nearest one-quarter of 1
percent.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
employer’s portion of the matching contribution rate for employees
and employers must not be adjusted in accordance with the
provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if:
(a) The existing rate is lower than the actuarially determined rate
but is within one-quarter of 1 percent of the actuarially determined
rate.
(b) The existing rate is higher than the actuarially determined
rate but is within 1 percent of the actuarially determined rate. If the
existing rate is more than 1 percent higher than the actuarially
determined rate, the existing rate must be reduced by the amount by
which it exceeds 1 percent above the actuarially determined rate.
3. The employer contribution rate for a participating state
agency must be:
(a) The total contribution rate that is actuarially determined
for police officers and firefighters and for regular members,
depending on the retirement fund in which the member is
participating, less the employee contribution rate as determined by
paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of NRS 286.410.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, adjusted on
the first monthly retirement reporting period commencing on or
after July 1 of each odd-numbered year based on the actuarially
determined normal cost as indicated in the biennial actuarial
valuation and report of the immediately preceding year. The
adjusted rate must be rounded to the nearest one-quarter of 1
percent.
4. The employer’s portion of the contribution rate for
employees of a participating state agency and employers who are
participating state agencies must not be adjusted in accordance
with the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 3 if:
(a) The existing rate is lower than the actuarially determined
rate but is within one-quarter of 1 percent of the actuarially
determined rate.
(b) The existing rate is higher than the actuarially determined
rate but is within 1 percent of the actuarially determined rate. If
the existing rate is more than 1 percent higher than the actuarially
determined rate, the existing rate must be reduced by the amount
by which it exceeds 1 percent above the actuarially determined
rate.
Sec. 8. NRS 286.808 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.808 1. The Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada shall contribute on behalf of each participant an amount
equal to [10] 17.5 percent of the participant’s gross compensation
-
*AB498_R1*

– 8 –
during continuance of employment. Each participant shall also
contribute [10] 17.5 percent of the participant’s gross compensation
. [, but the contributions required by this section must not be less
than those authorized by NRS 286.410 and 286.450.] Payment of
the contributions required by this section must be made by the
disbursing officer for the Nevada System of Higher Education to the
designated investment entities for the benefit of each participant.
2. The Board of Regents of the University of Nevada may, on
behalf of each participant, pay the contribution required to be paid
by the participant in subsection 1. Any such payment must be:
(a) Made in lieu of an equivalent increase in the basic salary or
in the cost of living for the participant, or both; or
(b) Counterbalanced by an equivalent reduction in the
participant’s salary.
Sec. 9. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
sections 10, 11 and 12 of this act, there is hereby appropriated from
the State General Fund to the State Board of Examiners for the
purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may be created between
the money appropriated to the departments, commissions and
agencies of the State of Nevada, including, without limitation, the
Commission on Judicial Discipline, as fixed by the 82nd Session of
the Nevada Legislature, and the requirements for increasing the
employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement
System pursuant to this act, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................. $58,342,302
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................. $63,410,225
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the State Board of Examiners the sum of $12,934,788 for Fiscal
Year 2023-2024 for reimbursement to any department, commission
or agency of the State of Nevada whose positions are included in the
Executive Budget, as provided by the 82nd Session of the Nevada
Legislature, and whose budget accounts have authorized reserves or
retained earnings, for the purpose of meeting any deficiencies which
may be created between the authorized money of the respective
departments, commissions and agencies of the State of Nevada, as
fixed by the 82nd Session of the Nevada Legislature, and the
requirements for increasing the employer contributions to the Public
Employee’s Retirement System pursuant to this act.
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the State Board of Examiners the sum of $12,483,068 for Fiscal
Year 2023-2024 for reimbursement to any department, commission
or agency of the State of Nevada whose positions are included in the
Executive Budget, as provided by the 82nd Session of the Nevada
Legislature, and whose budget accounts do not have authorized
reserves or retained earnings and do not receive any appropriations
-
*AB498_R1*

– 9 –
from the State General Fund or the State Highway Fund, for the
purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may be created between
the authorized money of the respective departments, commissions
and agencies of the State of Nevada, as fixed by the 82nd Session of
the Nevada Legislature, and the requirements for increasing the
employer contributions to the Public Employee’s Retirement
System pursuant to this act.
4. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by
subsections 1, 2 and 3 and, if applicable, transferred pursuant to this
subsection, at the end of Fiscal Year 2023-2024 must be carried
forward to Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to be used for the same purpose.
The sums appropriated by subsection 1 for Fiscal Year 2024-2025
may be transferred from Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to Fiscal Year
2023-2024 with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee
upon the recommendation of the Governor.
5. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by this
section must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2025,
by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to
which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 19, 2025, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Judicial Department Staff Salaries budget
account for the purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may be
created between the money appropriated to the Judicial Department
Staff Salaries budget account, as fixed by the 82nd Session of the
Nevada Legislature, and the requirements for increasing the
employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement
System pursuant to this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................... $1,568,795
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................... $1,734,157
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
-
*AB498_R1*

– 10 –
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 11. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Legislative Fund created by NRS 218A.150 for the
purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may be created between
the money appropriated to the Legislative Fund, as fixed by the
82nd Session of the Nevada Legislature, and the requirements for
increasing the employer contributions to the Public Employees’
Retirement System pursuant to this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................... $3,195,140
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................... $3,519,302
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Board of Examiners for the purpose of
meeting any deficiencies which may be created between the money
appropriated to the Nevada System of Higher Education, as fixed by
the 82nd Session of the Nevada Legislature, and the requirements
for increasing the employer contributions to the Public Employees’
Retirement System pursuant to this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................. $16,552,651
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................. $17,000,141
2. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by
subsection 1 at the end of Fiscal Year 2023-2024 must be carried
forward to Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to be used for the same purpose.
Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1 at
the end of Fiscal Year 2024-2025 must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2025, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 19, 2025, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 13. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the State Board of Examiners for the purpose of
meeting any deficiencies which may be created between the money
appropriated to the departments, commissions and agencies of the
State of Nevada, as fixed by the 82nd Session of the Nevada
Legislature, and the requirements for increasing the employer
contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant
to this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 ............................. $19,263,280
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................. $20,703,524
2. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by
subsection 1 and, if applicable, transferred pursuant to this
-
*AB498_R1*

– 11 –
subsection, at the end of Fiscal Year 2023-2024 must be carried
forward to Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to be used for the same purpose.
The sums appropriated by subsection 1 for Fiscal Year 2024-2025
may be transferred from Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to Fiscal Year
2023-2024 with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee
upon the recommendation of the Governor.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by this
section must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2025,
by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to
which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 19, 2025, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State Highway
Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB498_R1*